Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1131
Education programs; children with disabilities who are less than five years of age; voluntary.

Participation in or attendance at programs by children with disabilities who are less than five years of age shall be voluntary as specified by the parent or guardian. Programs serving children with disabilities who are less than three years of age shall, to the greatest extent possible, be based upon providing parent training in the home environment.

Laws 1976, LB 761, § 10;

Laws 1978, LB 889, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-646.01;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3324;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 813;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 21.